Hawaii statutes.
§76-50 Compensation and expenses of a merit
appeals board. Each member of a merit appeals board shall serve without
compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses,
necessary for the performance of their duties. [L 1955, c 274, pt of §1; RL
1955, pt of §3-13; HRS §76-50; gen ch 1985; am L 2000, c 253, §30]

Attorney General Opinions

Members of the civil service commission for the county of
Hawaii are not entitled to any compensation under this section. Att. Gen. Op.
88-4.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next